District of Columbia statutes.
32-1343

Filing a complaint with the Office of Human Rights; exclusive remedy.

(a)

A person claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of this subchapter may file an administrative complaint with the Office of Human Rights, in accordance with the procedures set forth in subchapter III of Unit A of Chapter 14 of Title 2 [§ 2-1403.01 et seq.].

(b)

The administrative remedies referenced in § 32-1344 are exclusive. A person claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of this subchapter shall have no private cause of action in any court based on a violation of this subchapter.

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-152, § 4, 61 DCR 8904
June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-278, § 309, 62 DCR 1920
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-278 rewrote (b).